trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/be/hunspell/be_BY.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3520 Y 1
SFX 3520 0 анеш .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 шым .
SFX 4811 Y 1
SFX 4811 0 анскім .
SFX 1009 Y 1
SFX 1009 0 вічу .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 іраваўшымі .
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 0 ва .
SFX 1653 Y 1
SFX 1653 0 ве .
SFX 1039 Y 1
SFX 1039 0 альнымі .
SFX 4835 Y 1
SFX 4835 0 цыйнымі .
SFX 4874 Y 1
SFX 4874 0 ннік .
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 0 йскага .
SFX 4063 Y 1
SFX 4063 0 шыўшых .
SFX 4062 Y 1
SFX 4062 0 шыўшыя .
SFX 2047 Y 1
SFX 2047 0 вальную .
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 0 лівым .
SFX 4364 Y 1
SFX 4364 0 іроўкай .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 ыўшую .
SFX 1038 Y 1
SFX 1038 0 альных .
SFX 1037 Y 1
SFX 1037 0 альныя .
SFX 3814 Y 1
SFX 3814 0 раючых .
SFX 3813 Y 1
SFX 3813 0 раючыя .
SFX 2068 Y 1
SFX 2068 0 нічаўшаю .
SFX 2067 Y 1
SFX 2067 0 нічаўшая .
SFX 1373 Y 1
SFX 1373 0 ляючым .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 авых .
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 0 авыя .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 ьную .
SFX 3130 Y 1
SFX 3130 0 алогію .
SFX 3069 Y 1
SFX 3069 0 алогія .
SFX 3131 Y 1
SFX 3131 0 алогіі .
SFX 3373 Y 1
SFX 3373 0 піць .
SFX 4420 Y 1
SFX 4420 0 льскі .
SFX 1892 Y 1
SFX 1892 0 руючую .
SFX 4933 Y 1
SFX 4933 0 яным .
SFX 4778 Y 1
SFX 4778 0 даюць .
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 0 шыць .
SFX 4055 Y 1
SFX 4055 0 алам .
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 ыўшага .
SFX 4308 Y 1
SFX 4308 0 чана .
SFX 2650 Y 1
SFX 2650 0 чане .
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 0 нічаем .
SFX 2769 Y 1
SFX 2769 0 хаўшымі .
SFX 813 Y 1
SFX 813 0 аваных .
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 0 аваныя .
SFX 1146 Y 1
SFX 1146 0 лівасць .
SFX 1287 Y 1
SFX 1287 0 лівасцю .
SFX 1288 Y 1
SFX 1288 0 лівасці .
SFX 3535 Y 1
SFX 3535 0 шанага .
SFX 4785 Y 1
SFX 4785 0 гаўшую .
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 0 шчыкамі .
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 0 неўшага .
SFX 4979 Y 1
SFX 4979 0 маўшы .
SFX 4129 Y 1
SFX 4129 0 нейшаму .
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 0 оваму .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 руючы .
SFX 2661 Y 1
SFX 2661 0 рскім .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 анага .
SFX 1290 Y 1
SFX 1290 0 енаю .
SFX 1326 Y 1
SFX 1326 0 еная .
SFX 4332 Y 1
SFX 4332 0 паеце .
SFX 3135 Y 1
SFX 3135 0 шкай .
SFX 2992 Y 1
SFX 2992 0 шкам .
SFX 1890 Y 1
SFX 1890 0 руючымі .
SFX 2702 Y 1
SFX 2702 0 чваючую .
SFX 2618 Y 1
SFX 2618 0 тцы .
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 0 ака .
SFX 3319 Y 1
SFX 3319 0 залі .
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 0 таваўшых .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 таваўшыя .
SFX 4915 Y 1
SFX 4915 0 графію .
SFX 4914 Y 1
SFX 4914 0 графія .
SFX 4916 Y 1
SFX 4916 0 графіі .
SFX 1498 Y 1
SFX 1498 0 раваўшую .
SFX 4128 Y 1
SFX 4128 0 нейшаю .
SFX 4127 Y 1
SFX 4127 0 нейшая .
SFX 2890 Y 1
SFX 2890 0 ліўшую .
SFX 3645 Y 1
SFX 3645 0 унамі .
SFX 1572 Y 1
SFX 1572 0 яце .
SFX 1715 Y 1
SFX 1715 0 чанае .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 0 чанай .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 ымі .
SFX 4374 Y 1
SFX 4374 0 бай .
SFX 3679 Y 1
SFX 3679 0 бам .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 нага .
SFX 3838 Y 1
SFX 3838 0 куюць .
SFX 4600 Y 1
SFX 4600 0 заванаму .
SFX 3969 Y 1
SFX 3969 0 віўшым .
SFX 2933 Y 1
SFX 2933 0 шкамі .
SFX 2626 Y 1
SFX 2626 0 ляемся .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 ецеся .
SFX 4799 Y 1
SFX 4799 0 арскімі .
SFX 410 Y 1
SFX 410 0 анню .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 ання .
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 0 анні .
SFX 3385 Y 1
SFX 3385 0 каўцы .
SFX 3552 Y 1
SFX 3552 0 лося .
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 ка .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 іўшы .
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 0 р .
SFX 841 Y 1
SFX 841 0 с .
SFX 432 Y 1
SFX 432 0 т .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 у .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 х .
SFX 544 Y 1
SFX 544 0 ц .
SFX 1293 Y 1
SFX 1293 0 ч .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 ш .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 ы .
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 0 ь .
SFX 3773 Y 1
SFX 3773 0 э .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 0 ю .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 я .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 і .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 ў .
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 0 нула .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 0 аўскаю .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 аўская .
SFX 4560 Y 1
SFX 4560 0 оўвалі .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 шую .
SFX 4072 Y 1
SFX 4072 0 шыўшае .
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 0 шыўшай .
SFX 2033 Y 1
SFX 2033 0 вальных .
SFX 2032 Y 1
SFX 2032 0 вальныя .
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 0 ьваліся .
SFX 1046 Y 1
SFX 1046 0 альнае .
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 0 альнай .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 ыўшых .
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 0 ыўшыя .
SFX 3822 Y 1
SFX 3822 0 раючае .
SFX 3821 Y 1
SFX 3821 0 раючай .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 аваўся .
SFX 2813 Y 1
SFX 2813 0 зацыю .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 зацыя .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 зацыі .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 ках .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 каю .
SFX 667 Y 1
SFX 667 0 кая .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 каў .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 авае .
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 авай .
SFX 4929 Y 1
SFX 4929 0 авак .
SFX 979 Y 1
SFX 979 0 лівую .
SFX 3904 Y 1
SFX 3904 0 таваны .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 ьных .
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 0 ьныя .
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 0 ізаваўшаму .
SFX 2213 Y 1
SFX 2213 0 іравалі .
SFX 1822 Y 1
SFX 1822 0 ўкай .
SFX 2852 Y 1
SFX 2852 0 ўкам .
SFX 1034 Y 1
SFX 1034 0 ячым .
SFX 4004 Y 1
SFX 4004 0 чаўшымі .
SFX 4967 Y 1
SFX 4967 0 ствамі .
SFX 4221 Y 1
SFX 4221 0 овачным .
SFX 1889 Y 1
SFX 1889 0 руючых .
SFX 1888 Y 1
SFX 1888 0 руючыя .
SFX 1374 Y 1
SFX 1374 0 ляючую .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 неўшы .
SFX 2272 Y 1
SFX 2272 0 ьвала .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 наваю .
SFX 3235 Y 1
SFX 3235 0 навая .
SFX 3249 Y 1
SFX 3249 0 зем .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 шымі .
SFX 3111 Y 1
SFX 3111 0 лісты .
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 0 яную .
SFX 823 Y 1
SFX 823 0 аванае .
SFX 822 Y 1
SFX 822 0 аванай .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 0 кнуць .
SFX 4132 Y 1
SFX 4132 0 нейшага .
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 0 овага .
SFX 4781 Y 1
SFX 4781 0 гаўшых .
SFX 4780 Y 1
SFX 4780 0 гаўшыя .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 раваўшаму .
SFX 1156 Y 1
SFX 1156 0 кавым .
SFX 4590 Y 1
SFX 4590 0 ісе .
SFX 3892 Y 1
SFX 3892 0 уўшы .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 цца .
SFX 3292 Y 1
SFX 3292 0 льшчыцамі .
SFX 3902 Y 1
SFX 3902 0 таванымі .
SFX 2698 Y 1
SFX 2698 0 чваючых .
SFX 2697 Y 1
SFX 2697 0 чваючыя .
SFX 2008 Y 1
SFX 2008 0 ізм .
SFX 1419 Y 1
SFX 1419 0 раваць .
SFX 2237 Y 1
SFX 2237 0 таваўшае .
SFX 2236 Y 1
SFX 2236 0 таваўшай .
SFX 2069 Y 1
SFX 2069 0 нічаўшаму .
SFX 3467 Y 1
SFX 3467 0 анула .
SFX 1495 Y 1
SFX 1495 0 раваўшых .
SFX 1494 Y 1
SFX 1494 0 раваўшыя .
SFX 1874 Y 1
SFX 1874 0 ліваўся .
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 0 іўшаму .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 ліўшых .
SFX 2885 Y 1
SFX 2885 0 ліўшыя .
SFX 1656 Y 1
SFX 1656 0 аву .
SFX 153 Y 1
SFX 153 0 авы .
SFX 3149 Y 1
SFX 3149 0 нутаю .
SFX 3148 Y 1
SFX 3148 0 нутая .
SFX 4166 Y 1
SFX 4166 0 ерны .
SFX 4013 Y 1
SFX 4013 0 ціну .
SFX 4525 Y 1
SFX 4525 0 ціны .
SFX 4827 Y 1
SFX 4827 0 ыха .
SFX 3815 Y 1
SFX 3815 0 раючымі .
SFX 1794 Y 1
SFX 1794 0 ыкай .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 0 ыкам .
SFX 3673 Y 1
SFX 3673 0 зяце .
SFX 1205 Y 1
SFX 1205 0 калі .
SFX 4603 Y 1
SFX 4603 0 заванага .
SFX 4976 Y 1
SFX 4976 0 нала .
SFX 3682 Y 1
SFX 3682 0 аўкай .
SFX 1327 Y 1
SFX 1327 0 енаму .
SFX 4034 Y 1
SFX 4034 0 йку .
SFX 4464 Y 1
SFX 4464 0 йкі .
SFX 1158 Y 1
SFX 1158 0 ачны .
SFX 4630 Y 1
SFX 4630 0 анце .
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 0 ітам .
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 0 віце .
SFX 3971 Y 1
SFX 3971 0 віўшую .
SFX 2578 Y 1
SFX 2578 0 чвалі .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 шых .
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 0 шыш .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 шыя .
SFX 3995 Y 1
SFX 3995 0 шыў .
SFX 3071 Y 1
SFX 3071 0 авікам .
SFX 4809 Y 1
SFX 4809 0 анскіх .
SFX 4925 Y 1
SFX 4925 0 анскія .
SFX 2051 Y 1
SFX 2051 0 вальнае .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 вальнай .
SFX 894 Y 1
SFX 894 0 ву .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 зуючы .
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 вы .
SFX 3010 Y 1
SFX 3010 0 навымі .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 ыўшае .
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 0 ыўшай .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 0 ўшым .
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 0 ніцай .
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 0 ніцам .
SFX 3032 Y 1
SFX 3032 0 овец .
SFX 4285 Y 1
SFX 4285 0 яецца .
SFX 4459 Y 1
SFX 4459 0 ізаваўшага .
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 0 лівых .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 лівыя .
SFX 856 Y 1
SFX 856 0 ьнае .
SFX 855 Y 1
SFX 855 0 ьнай .
SFX 4363 Y 1
SFX 4363 0 іроўкаю .
SFX 4017 Y 1
SFX 4017 0 саць .
SFX 1484 Y 1
SFX 1484 0 кайце .
SFX 2627 Y 1
SFX 2627 0 канне .
SFX 4460 Y 1
SFX 4460 0 ізаваў .
SFX 1897 Y 1
SFX 1897 0 руючае .
SFX 1896 Y 1
SFX 1896 0 руючай .
SFX 2444 Y 1
SFX 2444 0 дзіла .
SFX 1371 Y 1
SFX 1371 0 ляючых .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 ляючыя .
SFX 4860 Y 1
SFX 4860 0 піла .
SFX 1554 Y 1
SFX 1554 0 ннымі .
SFX 1051 Y 1
SFX 1051 0 ячую .
SFX 4222 Y 1
SFX 4222 0 овачную .
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 0 яных .
SFX 1504 Y 1
SFX 1504 0 раваўшага .
SFX 4790 Y 1
SFX 4790 0 гаўшае .
SFX 4789 Y 1
SFX 4789 0 гаўшай .
SFX 4818 Y 1
SFX 4818 0 алах .
SFX 1684 Y 1
SFX 1684 0 чаны .
SFX 2077 Y 1
SFX 2077 0 нічаеш .
SFX 2620 Y 1
SFX 2620 0 стасць .
SFX 2686 Y 1
SFX 2686 0 стасцю .
SFX 2687 Y 1
SFX 2687 0 стасці .
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 0 кавую .
SFX 2707 Y 1
SFX 2707 0 чваючае .
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 0 чваючай .
SFX 2072 Y 1
SFX 2072 0 нічаўшага .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 0 раванымі .
SFX 2659 Y 1
SFX 2659 0 рскіх .
SFX 2714 Y 1
SFX 2714 0 рскія .
SFX 3974 Y 1
SFX 3974 0 віўшаму .
SFX 1503 Y 1
SFX 1503 0 раваўшае .
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 0 раваўшай .
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 0 іўшага .
SFX 1581 Y 1
SFX 1581 0 ліваюць .
SFX 2873 Y 1
SFX 2873 0 шках .
SFX 3134 Y 1
SFX 3134 0 шкаю .
SFX 2895 Y 1
SFX 2895 0 ліўшае .
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 0 ліўшай .
SFX 2035 Y 1
SFX 2035 0 вальнаму .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 0 аку .
SFX 3020 Y 1
SFX 3020 0 акі .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 аўшым .
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 ыла .
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 яць .
SFX 1329 Y 1
SFX 1329 0 енага .
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 0 нка .
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 0 чанаю .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 чаная .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 чка .
SFX 1901 Y 1
SFX 1901 0 нскую .
SFX 3030 Y 1
SFX 3030 0 раеце .
SFX 3766 Y 1
SFX 3766 0 бах .
SFX 4793 Y 1
SFX 4793 0 баю .
SFX 3395 Y 1
SFX 3395 0 баў .
SFX 1584 Y 1
SFX 1584 0 ліваўшымі .
SFX 1940 Y 1
SFX 1940 0 жаны .
SFX 3967 Y 1
SFX 3967 0 віўшых .
SFX 3966 Y 1
SFX 3966 0 віўшыя .
SFX 3891 Y 1
SFX 3891 0 уўшым .
SFX 1275 Y 1
SFX 1275 0 шчыцай .
SFX 1274 Y 1
SFX 1274 0 шчыцам .
SFX 3013 Y 1
SFX 3013 0 істка .
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 0 ычнаму .
SFX 2701 Y 1
SFX 2701 0 чваючы .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 шае .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 шай .
SFX 3022 Y 1
SFX 3022 0 шак .
SFX 2385 Y 1
SFX 2385 0 шам .
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 0 ленне .
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 0 чыцай .
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 0 чыцам .
SFX 3516 Y 1
SFX 3516 0 вод .
SFX 1385 Y 1
SFX 1385 0 вое .
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 0 вой .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 ку .
SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 0 кі .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 яўся .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 льшчык .
SFX 4154 Y 1
SFX 4154 0 заваўшым .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 нулі .
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 0 ніўшым .
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 0 ніцкаму .
SFX 4069 Y 1
SFX 4069 0 шыўшаю .
SFX 4068 Y 1
SFX 4068 0 шыўшая .
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 лівае .
SFX 688 Y 1
SFX 688 0 лівай .
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 0 рскі .
SFX 1043 Y 1
SFX 1043 0 альнаю .
SFX 1042 Y 1
SFX 1042 0 альная .
SFX 3819 Y 1
SFX 3819 0 раючаю .
SFX 3818 Y 1
SFX 3818 0 раючая .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 0 самі .
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 0 ўшую .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 еўшы .
SFX 1075 Y 1
SFX 1075 0 падобнымі .
SFX 1379 Y 1
SFX 1379 0 ляючае .
SFX 1378 Y 1
SFX 1378 0 ляючай .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 аваю .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 авая .
SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424 0 аваў .
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 0 ўках .
SFX 1821 Y 1
SFX 1821 0 ўкаю .
SFX 1049 Y 1
SFX 1049 0 ячых .
SFX 1048 Y 1
SFX 1048 0 ячыя .
SFX 3996 Y 1
SFX 3996 0 шыла .
SFX 4219 Y 1
SFX 4219 0 овачных .
SFX 4218 Y 1
SFX 4218 0 овачныя .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 0 ьвалі .
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 0 ючымі .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 0 жваць .
SFX 4059 Y 1
SFX 4059 0 ьваешся .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 ўшыся .
SFX 3539 Y 1
SFX 3539 0 чаце .
SFX 2757 Y 1
SFX 2757 0 авальнаму .
SFX 4031 Y 1
SFX 4031 0 лагічны .
SFX 3837 Y 1
SFX 3837 0 ліна .
SFX 3578 Y 1
SFX 3578 0 ліне .
SFX 1238 Y 1
SFX 1238 0 нкай .
SFX 1084 Y 1
SFX 1084 0 нкам .
SFX 3511 Y 1
SFX 3511 0 зеш .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 0 ылася .
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 0 аванаю .
SFX 820 Y 1
SFX 820 0 аваная .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 аваўшымі .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 0 цім .
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 0 кавых .
SFX 1206 Y 1
SFX 1206 0 кавыя .
SFX 3565 Y 1
SFX 3565 0 тарамі .
SFX 1534 Y 1
SFX 1534 0 іст .
SFX 1033 Y 1
SFX 1033 0 іся .
SFX 1472 Y 1
SFX 1472 0 ціце .
SFX 4330 Y 1
SFX 4330 0 пайце .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 ваецца .
SFX 4981 Y 1
SFX 4981 0 льская .
SFX 3977 Y 1
SFX 3977 0 віўшага .
SFX 3604 Y 1
SFX 3604 0 жвацца .
SFX 2013 Y 1
SFX 2013 0 вальнага .
SFX 1535 Y 1
SFX 1535 0 евіч .
